Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6093 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any insurer to increase a motor vehicle
liability insurance policy premium based solely on the removal by a
named insured of a deceased spouse from the policy. The removal of
a deceased spouse shall not be treated as a material change in risk
for purposes of underwriting, rating classification, or premium
calculation. Nothing in this section shall be construed as to
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3802 Page 1

prev ent insurers from increasing premiums at renewal based on either
documented changes in any actuarially supported risk factors not
otherwise prohibited by law, including but not limited to driving
record, claims history, coverage elections, mileage, garaging
location, or other actuarially supported risk factors; or rate
changes approved by the Oklahoma Insurance Department that are
applied uniformly to a class of insureds. Any premium increase
imposed in violation of this section shall be void and
unenforceable, and the insurer shall refund any excess premium
collected.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate





ENGR. H. B. NO. 3802 Page 2